dictsource/dv_rules
 
// This file is UTF8 encoded
// Spelling-to-phoneme rules for Divehi (Maldives)

.group ހ
        ހ        h

.group ށ
        ށ        s.

.group ނ
        ނ        n
        ން (ނ      nn
       ން (މ      mm
       ން (ޏ      n^n^

.group ރ
        ރ        R

.group ބ
        ބ        b

.group ޅ
        ޅ        l.

.group ކ
        ކ        k

.group އ
        އ                // alifu
        އް (_        eh
        އް (ހ       h
       އް (ށ       h
       އް (ހ       s.
       އް (ނ       n
       އް (ރ         R
       އް (ބ        b
       އް (ޅ        l.
       އް (ކ        k
       އް (ކ        v
       އް (މ        m
       އް (ދ        d
       އް (ތ        t
       އް (ލ        l
       އް (ގ        g
      އް (ޏ        N
      އް (ސ        s
      އް (ޑ        d.
      އް (ޒ        z
      އް (ޓ        t.
      އް (ޔ        j
      އް (ޕ        p
      އް (ޖ        dZ
      އް (ޗ        tS
      އް (ޜ        Z

.group ވ
        ވ        v

.group މ
        މ        m

.group ފ
        ފ        f

.group ދ
        ދ        d

.group ތ
        ތ        t

.group ލ
        ލ        l

.group ގ
        ގ        g

.group ޏ
        ޏ        n^

.group ސ
        ސ        s

.group ޑ
        ޑ        d.

.group ޒ
        ޒ        z

.group ޓ
        ޓ        t.

.group ޔ
        ޔ        j

.group ޕ
        ޕ        p

.group ޖ
        ޖ        dZ

.group ޗ
        ޗ        tS

.group ޘ
        ޘ        T

.group ޙ
        ޙ        h

.group ޚ
        ޚ        x

.group ޛ
        ޛ        D



.group ޜ
        ޜ        Z

.group ޝ
        ޝ        S

.group ޞ
        ޞ        s

.group ޟ
        ޟ        d

.group ޠ
        ޠ        t

.group ޡ
        ޡ        z

.group ޢ
        ޢ        ?

.group ޣ
        ޣ        Q

.group ޤ
        ޤ        q

.group ޥ
        ޥ        w


.group ަ
        ަ        a

.group ާ
        ާ        a:

.group ި
        ި        i

.group ީ
        ީ        i:

.group ު
        ު        u

.group ޫ
        ޫ        u:

.group ެ
        ެ        e

.group ޭ
        ޭ        e:

.group ޮ
        ޮ        o

.group ޯ
        ޯ        o:

.group ް
        ް                // sukun

.group ޱ
        ޱ        n.

.group
        $        dolaR
